
Moon Sprint 3.3 Project Power Up
Wed, Nov 05, 2025 11:08AM • 2:35:44
SUMMARY KEYWORDS
Infection prevention, stainless steel, co-design, compliance, safety, human performance, audit anxiety, ergonomics, workflow mapping, regulatory rigor, custom systems, ISO standards, TIG welding, crevice-free, brand promise., Website redesign, Emory Co Design Lab, workflow mapping, social proof, brand governance, content creation, marketing strategy, AI advisor, project management, team coordination, client engagement, professional image, creative direction, user experience, action items., workload, gratitude, AI learning, husband support, property management, cleaning job, wardrobe, designer criticism, financial stress, special place, universe magic, job replacement, fresh eyes, investment, address sharing
SPEAKERS
Lisa Galea, Speaker 6, Speaker 5, Speaker 2, Speaker 1, Speaker 4

00:00
Other room as well. So the backup,

Lisa Galea  00:03
perfect, all right. Vision. We envision a world where infection prevention is engineered into every environment, built with stainless precision co design with care teams and sustained for generations. Yes, I like that. Yeah, I thought that. Then it goes to like we, we have to say we last for ages. So that's why we're saying like the generations it says about your co designing, and obviously the stainless custom design. So I thought that is a good one. No one really knows your vision. Do you know? I mean, but you do know that you want? Yeah, you want it to be that you've got environments that are safe from infection in the future. It's basically and you want the future generations protected so when they go to hospitals, we don't get golden staff, we don't get all these diseases that are going through hospitals like in England, you wouldn't even visit one. You people dread going to hospital. They'd rather

Speaker 1  01:02
die. That vision covers globally as well. Like everyone from different areas will understand

Lisa Galea  01:10
that, yes, that's what I thought, Australia specific. Yeah, I have got if you guys, because I'll share this with you, but I have got drafts over here. But I think that I thought this actually covered everything,

Speaker 1  01:23
everything, yeah, that it covers. It's not just medical equipment either. It's,

Lisa Galea  01:29
yeah, that's what I took out from our first, yeah, I took that out from our last one because I was, like, the other ones were really sort of saying we're hospital where this is, like, we don't want germs anywhere? Yeah, we want to be the manufacturer for, yeah, making safe environments. So that's that I thought was good. Our mission is. So the vision is like a dream world. Obviously, you're not going to get a world where every single environment is protected, but that's what you're imagining, right? That's what a vision should be. A mission is actually what we can achieve. Yeah, right, so that sort of helps you think about it. Yeah, differentiate. So to co design and manufacture compliance engineered stainless systems that reduce infection risk, improve human performance and eliminate audit anxiety or why lasting the building they're installed in? I don't know about the audit. I don't think that needs to be there at that level.

Speaker 1  02:29
No, I'm just scared if we call that audit, there are WEP,

Lisa Galea  02:33
yeah, I don't think it's like emission is like, that's a bonus. Do you eliminate anxiety? That reduce,

02:42
improve human performance and eliminate they're not

Lisa Galea  02:45
you don't want, I don't think we need that. Yeah, I don't think we improve human import performance or why? I think simplify. Why that standing, outlasting, the building there. We

Speaker 1  02:58
need something about safety, because a big part of what we do,

Lisa Galea  03:03
that's what, that's why, that's why the anxiety is in there. We've got to sneak in then so we could put produce strain de risk, critical care or de risk, because that's sort of

Speaker 2  03:23
about safety, helping with their risk. Yeah, instead of, like in building, we're reducing their risk in with the builders and stuff. Yeah, so going with a local company,

Speaker 1  03:37
so your risk can do a lot of different things. Yeah,

Lisa Galea  03:41
that would de risk.

03:43
I don't think anxiety.

Lisa Galea  03:47
I would say, um, infection reduce, but we've got reduce infection risk. We've already got that. Yeah, we've already got that reduce and reduce. Increase. Safety is more you want to increase something, you don't increase.

Speaker 2  04:07
Increase, yeah, increase. Safety is okay, yeah, that,

Speaker 1  04:15
yeah, I like it. After the human performance

Lisa Galea  04:18
increase, they reduce infection ratio, improve human performance and

Speaker 1  04:26
increase safety increase, because users safety or increase

Lisa Galea  04:32
and create while you're making safe environments safety increase, I think it's the environments that's missing. We say you um, making safe environments sort of thing,

Speaker 4  04:45
reduce, reducing that comes under working environment,

Lisa Galea  04:50
yeah, so improving human performance and de risking or. And improving. I think we can do better than that,

Speaker 2  05:06
and and improve human performance and

05:12
the court environment. What's a better word?

Lisa Galea  05:18
Not sterilize? That's the one that bloody. Don't know. Okay, we will find that. Because I just realized on a whole list of words that's just put in here, I was like, Oh my God, what are your three words? And then I went, ended up going because I hated the word sterile, really, because I've got sterile in my brand thing as, like, never sterile, right? Because I'm, like, obviously crazy, but you guys actually sterile is important.

Speaker 2  05:47
We want to be infection controlled, and we want to be sterile improve

Lisa Galea  05:51
human performance, and trusted

05:55
and trusted safety. Environments

Lisa Galea  05:58
safe, yeah, and build safe. Yeah, just put that in there for now. Something about that is what we're really saying, isn't it? Because this vision of a legacy of safety like that, I like to that reduce infectious and I

Speaker 1  06:23
we could always improve human performance and leave a legacy of safety,

Lisa Galea  06:29
but that's the outlasting the building they're installing, isn't it really saying that's why we're going to be so long but, but we will ergonomic.

Speaker 1  06:40
Do we want to use the word ergonomic? Because that's all the how hard, adjustable

Lisa Galea  06:44
stuff. But then is that like again, in your mission being specific to one area? Yeah, I think it's more you're reducing risk. Yes, you're in perfume. You're always performing performance. You're always

Speaker 1  06:56
making safe work environments. That does that right? Well, would

Lisa Galea  07:00
it be self care environments, critical care environments, care and

Speaker 1  07:08
well, it could be, but we're also do, like, kitchens and stuff, so we, I don't

Lisa Galea  07:12
want to, yeah, let's just leave on that. Okay, yeah, let's go down to our brand promise. We're engineered for certainty, crafted for care, yeah, do you think these were the other?

Speaker 1  07:26
What does engineer for certainty mean?

Lisa Galea  07:30
Like, you're made for strength and you're going to last, but that's these. Okay, so go through, I thought the built for sterility. I thought too much. Yeah, I did, like, designed with you, but see, that's I thought, then, like, we do move that in as just a headline,

Speaker 1  07:48
yeah, I think engineered for certainty, crafted with care.

Lisa Galea  07:54
I like, Yeah, I like the crafted with care, but you're engineered like, that's the

08:00
Yeah, everything's gonna work. And last and

Lisa Galea  08:03
yeah, and that's is really what it's saying, is like, you can guarantee what you're going to get, yeah, and that's what they're worried about. Do you know what I mean is, like, you know what you're going to get with us, because we're here to make sure that you get what you want. So that's what I thought in that I do like that, yeah. And I thought that engineering brings you into their sphere, like, rather than being like, you know, crafting is like, Oh, we're making things nice, yes, whereas engineering is like, we know we're making a design, and it's a grid, a good product, yeah, it's a grid thing. So here is again, the draft. See, the design for humans. I don't think any of that necessary. I just think this, yeah, I thought that was good. Then we have got our positioning statement was for sterile processing department. See, I don't think that first line. I thought that didn't need to be in there. I thought Emory industries co design stainless steel systems that reduce audit risk injury and stand the test of time. We engineer around your people, your workflow and your compliance needs, because nothing should come between your team and safe care.

Speaker 1  09:21
I like that second bit. Something about that first bits

Lisa Galea  09:27
throwing me off. What about risk? Reduce risk because you do that

09:33
better. Risk, a

Speaker 1  09:41
risk and injury. The same thing, reduce risk injury?

Lisa Galea  09:45
Well, no, because risk is, I think for the builders, they're the builders worried about the risk.

Speaker 1  09:51
Yeah. Okay, Santa's time we engineer for your people. Around your people,

Lisa Galea  10:03
around your people, your workflow and your compliance

Speaker 1  10:06
needs. I don't understand that around your people. We engineer around

Lisa Galea  10:11
we'll engineer with your people. For your people,

10:25
I happy to leave it as a round, if that makes

Lisa Galea  10:27
sense to engineer, I'll double check it right? Let's just put it in a different color and say, double check that with the box. Is there any other words for around? Okay, so we're not just seeing it for the minute, all right? So that was that we have got these longer ones, because really the positioning statement is, again, I mean that I thought it is really pretty clear. They had put, unlike catalog suppliers, which I was like, Well, I don't think we need to add that negative in, but it can be added in if it was just in the copy of an article. Do you know what I mean? That's why I've, like put these draft ones here, because I think that really, if you were writing in a hospital, you would put for SDD departments, you know, affection control specialists. You could start writing that into introduce them so they reckon, for them who need durable

Speaker 1  11:18
one of the comments that I put on the audience sheet is that SPD is the American version of our CSSD,

Lisa Galea  11:33
yes, and we're going to swap that over with the brand. That's the goal. Is, if you see that, we swap it in, yeah, yeah.

11:43
Depends on what country we're,

Lisa Galea  11:44
yeah, that's country and specific, yeah, yeah. I do know that. I've got that on the chat. I've got that I was like a thing in one of the specs, country specifically. I When you go to this conference, are we on? We're on this though, aren't we stare?

Speaker 1  12:07
SPD, yeah. SPD, was Ed will be the Hong Kong,

Lisa Galea  12:11
yeah. So worldwide, you use that Australia only. You use the CSD,

Speaker 1  12:16
yeah. There was something different for the UK, but I don't know if that was England, but I think they also talk in the Euro talk, which is, SPD,

Lisa Galea  12:27
yeah, Euro is thought of as better as you at the moment. Yes, alright, so that's what we want to switch, is that we've got, like, higher standards here. Yes, right? So that's and I think that's because that actually says what the problem is, that solving their problems, they don't give a shit if you're Australian made they care that you're higher standard, right? So we will. We've got that in the change of so that's when I was getting ready. I was like, Okay, let's make sure that this is what we'll be putting on our booth. Which I which really these are words that will be through the slide deck. Yes. So compliant by design. Are we allowed to say that? Because you are basically designing it to be compliant for them.

Speaker 1  13:24
I think so, because that's not saying we guarantee that every single thing we do is compliant. It's saying that if we design something, it will be

Lisa Galea  13:33
compliant. Yes, that's what I thought we will design to your compliance is really what we're saying? Yeah, right, so I think that's a good one for saying it's not locking you in, but it is explaining what we need. So custom stainless systems that pass audits, because obviously they will if you've actually done the compliance by design, yeah, protect teams and outlast catalog gear, right?

Speaker 1  14:05
And catalog gives that means, just like buying off the shelf, yeah? Someone from

Lisa Galea  14:09
China, would you call that off the shelf? Would they call it off the shelf? What would they call that? Because I didn't like

Speaker 1  14:18
standard products, like, yeah? Like, more standard sizing

Lisa Galea  14:24
or so we want to put, I'll put, I'll find out what the right or the right word, yeah, because I think it's standard. I think it's like, we've got to make sure that they understand. You have to put the wheels on and you have to do the shit. So how

14:42
does fit for purpose, whereas the other ones, you have to,

Lisa Galea  14:47
okay, then I don't I think you should say fit for purpose, not reduce audit, not pass audits, not reduce that's a much better like the way you're saying that is obviously they understand that they. Language, I think, as well, right fit for purpose is what they would say. And that's exactly what you're doing. You're protecting the team. And it I don't think we need outlast this, but it's we need to say something about the catalog, how you're better than China. Yeah, that's what that needs to say.

Speaker 1  15:21
Do we want to mention something there that's like has something to do with with our compliance and with our standards

Lisa Galea  15:30
well underneath here? So that's our main thing. And then it would be your ergonomic yes crevice, very Yes.

Speaker 1  15:44
We can't really claim that. We can claim that our TIG welding doesn't leave like pockets for germs.

Speaker 2  15:53
So it's catchment for infection control. So there's no catchment areas infection control.

Lisa Galea  16:03
Okay, now what we're gonna do is so ergonomic we minimize infection control. That's enough. I thought that was a bit much to say. Your crevice free your eyes such, we get rid of that too. I thought

Speaker 1  16:20
ISO aligned? No, because the ISO compliance global is Antony, yeah. So that should resonate.

Lisa Galea  16:31
And you're not saying obviously, like here, you're not saying, we cover every ISO. No, do you know what I mean? So I think that's your art. You are aligned. You try to be aligned with whatever you can your code. You're not co engineered to your workflow. So they are the supporting topics for this. These people at they're the most important things to the people in your conference. Yeah. Okay, so now, do they care about this? Do they know the sameness grades?

Speaker 2  17:03
Yeah, three or four and 316, the marine grade. So we do it, but it's not standard. Do you remember 95%

Speaker 1  17:12
of our stuff is 304, and then we have an upgrade option of 316, which, like Townsville hospital, is right on the coast, does 316, so they don't get

17:23
it's marine grade, yeah, 316 Okay, so 304,

Lisa Galea  17:29
let me just put that so I'm knowing this when I'm putting in the copy. That's why I wanted to make sure it was clear before I messed it

Speaker 2  17:35
up. Standard. And then we can upgrade off. We can do 316, upgraded, yeah.

Lisa Galea  17:45
And I'll put put upgrade and I'll put Marine, because they, they know that as well. Then they like, oh yeah, marine standard, right?

Speaker 1  17:52
Yeah. Because, for some reason, whenever we say it's more in standard, everyone goes, oh my goodness, wow. But then when you say three or four is like, medical and food standard, they go, whatever, yeah, yeah. Marine standard, everyone

Lisa Galea  18:06
goes, Oh my goodness. Well, one Marine is like a mystery word. We love it. And also it's like water, it's in water, yeah? So it just seems like, Oh my God, that's harsh, because it's going to last in water. We know that means it's strong. So laser weld. Is that what you would say?

Speaker 1  18:24
TIG weld, the T I G, I wonder, What does T I G stand for something? Or is it just, it's

Speaker 2  18:32
different type of welding. It's like a standard of welding, fine seam welding. TIG welding is, yeah,

Speaker 1  18:38
and it's an extra qualification that the welders have to have to do go and get it's not just yeah,

18:45
you can do it yeah. They

Lisa Galea  18:46
have to Yeah, TIG worlds. And what did you say before about I think this is where we put catchment areas. Yeah. TIG worlds

18:56
minimize catchment areas to

19:01
minimize infection control risk,

Lisa Galea  19:03
but yeah, no, I think we're TIG worlds for put catchment areas. I don't think we want to minimize again, but we want to say something about it, yeah. If we're talking about it, we would say, really, those annoying bits you know, that they know happen in joints, yes, so we need to just wing. I think that's more of a, this is like the micro copies, more the story catchment areas. Yeah, that's a word that they would know, isn't it? Like they would use that area, or there's catchment areas, would they sort of, that makes sense to them?

Speaker 1  19:36
Yeah, in this with these people for this area of the hospital, they will, yeah,

Lisa Galea  19:43
I've got a feeling TIG is like that, but I'll check.

Speaker 1  19:47
I thought it was capital letters T, iG, like I thought it

Lisa Galea  19:51
stands for something, maybe, yeah, yeah, my brother's bestie is, well, he goes down and does like the. Welding on, you know, oil rigs, like submarines and stuff, yeah? Like, he got voted, like, I think he's one of the top in the world. He's in America. Oh, wow. He paid for their whole honeymoon, because basically, you're going to die if you go into it. It's so deep he has to be in a container for ages after, yeah. So he learned, like, he was in South Australia. Now on the submarines, that's where he did his apprenticeship. So he's got, oh, wow, yeah, he did us a really cool bar for my brother's birthday. All right, so are we any of this? Would we knock it

Speaker 4  20:32
off? Amy, that's a US standard.

Lisa Galea  20:36
Yeah, I'm just gonna put here, um, you know, now with streams, I'm just gonna put use logos.

Speaker 4  20:42
Um, what's electro polish? Do we do that as well? It's a type of

Speaker 2  20:47
finish. We don't really do it.

Speaker 1  20:51
What is our finishing process called? Because it does change the how the steel looks.

Speaker 2  20:59
We get satin, satin finished steel. We purchased it like that as a satin finish

Speaker 1  21:07
so that when it gets finished in the finishing area, it comes up super clean.

Speaker 2  21:11
You could, you could probably put we have a laser cutter, like a fiber up deep laser cutter.

Lisa Galea  21:19
I think these people do? I mean, I don't. I think the builders care more about your equipment, but I think we will write it here fiber.

21:29
I want to say all the five, five. Yeah,

Lisa Galea  21:32
I know. We will check that so we don't sound like tracks. That's why my check vocabulary of what they actually say in that department. Okay, use logos for social proof as well, because that's when we'll put your actual logos of whatever you've got. It doesn't actually matter what they are, as long as there's a line of logos, right? So we wanted words are a safety proof relief prime trust in risk averse environments. So this is really what I'm going to be putting in for the bot. Okay, the SPD leaders want certainty and dignity at audit, less strain at the bench and partners who bring the data then get out the way. Does that sound right to you? Yeah?

Speaker 2  22:27
So yeah, they they consider themselves the expert. Yeah, very much. So, okay, cool.

Lisa Galea  22:36
Now proof pillars we were going to so we're saying we've got regulatory rigor. That means that you have, like, you care about your regular Yeah, your rig

22:50
quality assurance is Yeah.

Lisa Galea  22:54
So we would say that is true, isn't it? We're not going to say exactly

Speaker 2  22:59
this, and that ISO is not the correct, yeah,

Lisa Galea  23:03
so we're just gonna say 9001

Speaker 1  23:10
I think it is. Do we say for the environment

Lisa Galea  23:14
one? I'm gonna put up here. I think we just put, we'll put the Reggie Vera. We just put, again, the social proof,

Speaker 1  23:30
yeah, with the logos, with the logo, because we do, I get has done a

Lisa Galea  23:35
strip with all our Yeah, that's really, that's all they need to see, honestly, like they don't really give a shit what they are. It's just to give their brain it materials and world specs. We're going to take off that, but we will check them, as we could say before, just to make sure we've got the right thing. Then we've got eliminating, but we're not reducing, reducing crevice and resist pitting. Would you say that? No, not that pitting is holes, no pitting, yeah, attachment, yeah, reducing crevices for infection control, that's a benefit for increased Okay, so whole point, and that's really what these guys care about, isn't it? At this conference, this is conference material, okay, custom without compromise, co engineer to site workflow and builders schedules, but that's not relevant for this conference, no, but that's good for the builders. Yeah, good for the builders. We've got the lifetime value. I think they really need to know that, because you are that is a big point of difference, because what do they call it? Cost of life? Us, yeah, your your life value, yeah, the cost, yeah, yeah. If they say cost of life, is that what they use? They do, yeah,

25:09
okay, product life or something, yeah?

Lisa Galea  25:12
So we'll put something like that in, because that's what they're looking at. Because if you think about it, it's like, I, I did think with mine, how much

Speaker 2  25:19
value I can get out of it. Like, instead of if I buy this product, I'm only going to get four years out of it. Rather than if I buy this product, I'm going to get 10

Lisa Galea  25:27
years out of it. Like, what, exactly? And I mean, I bought a fire pit, and it's, I think, 10 mil stainless, yeah. And it costs two grand, right? Is teppanyaki, right? But I've got one from Bunnings. I've bought for myself, like, the guests have got that I mail on the third one. Like, basically I get one winter. There's holes in them. They're shit. So having that thick, you can see, because I was Googling, I was like, why is it so expensive compared to this one? Then I was like, it makes such a huge difference on the thickness. Oh, yeah. So getting that through on the storyline is fine. We WHAT DID YOU KNOW what T CO was? No, I don't know what TCO is, durability, uptime and fewer risks. So this, I'll check what that means. Faster. Turner over at peak loads and fewer. That is at builders again,

26:27
total cost of ownership, T, C,

Lisa Galea  26:32
lifetime value. So that is via durability, uptime. That's that's cost of life. Yeah, that's cost of life. Is that relevant there? Yes, that's to the cost of life. That's relevant to these guys.

26:53
Yeah, yeah,

Lisa Galea  26:54
that's what I thought. That's why these are, like your evidence. But this one where it's got fast turnover at peak loads that's to do with builders, because this one hasn't got that. No, yeah, okay, that's why I'm just checking with you guys. That's why I'm like, Let's Get really clear, because you guys know which one I'm talking to. Okay, so hide adjustable benches. They care about that, don't they reach zones they care about lighting, workflow, mapping, reduced drain errors and rework. That one's good. What's this? Decon systems. Do you know what that is?

Speaker 2  27:30
Decon decontamination. So it's actually, yeah, it's a room.

Lisa Galea  27:36
So who cares about that? The builders or these people? Oh, the builders are going to build the road. Okay, so with these people, we don't mention it. These people just care about the benches.

Speaker 1  27:46
The CST people go into the Decon room as well. Yeah, the Decon room.

Lisa Galea  27:52
So height adjustable,

27:54
the sterilizers and everything are in the day con.

Lisa Galea  27:57
Would you prefer to say, then height adjustable benches, or height adjustable bench prep and decon systems,

Speaker 1  28:04
I would almost say high adjustable equipment, because then it

28:09
covers a bit. Yeah,

Lisa Galea  28:10
and no mention of decon systems. They already know where they're going.

Speaker 1  28:14
They're I think, I think decon systems comes under workflow mapping, like it's kind of the different areas

28:21
in the areas, yeah,

Lisa Galea  28:25
because that's what words I didn't understand. Okay, that's WEP flow mapping. That's the room, indeed.

Speaker 2  28:32
Yeah, decon system is basically a room, and it's got all the height adjustable things and the sterilize and

Lisa Galea  28:38
that's where you were saying. It's a tiny room. Yeah, yes. They need more space, more space workflow mapping, reduced strain errors and rework. Yeah. So they've put throughput gains for understaffed teams, right? But do you think that's

Speaker 2  28:56
true? You don't really want to point out that they're understaffed,

Lisa Galea  28:59
no. And reach zone designed to reduce strain and errors. Yes, that makes sense, that and that. But is that more? That's what the host day care? I mean, we'll put it just in short. But that is that they care about that, don't they? The hospital people, the hospital people, yep, prep and lighting. Do you have that? Do you have that prep and lighting or not really.

Speaker 1  29:23
We have it on our lighting that we add on to our sinks and benches and stuff.

Lisa Galea  29:28
I think we just leave that to equipment again. Keep it general, and we just keep that being as a they do care about it

29:37
as we'll add it in extra

Lisa Galea  29:40
and then got rid of ergoz. I think they definitely care about that. And then we've got regularly social proof alignment, blah, blah, blah, I will put the laser weld, and then I'll put marine upgrade.

Speaker 1  29:54
There'll be TIG weld, and yeah, three on six is the nine.

30:09
That

Lisa Galea  30:15
I would say,

30:18
crevice free, materials free, is a

Lisa Galea  30:22
big Yeah, no, I think I like the fabrication word, though. So social proof materials and world spare. So we would say TIG, world fabrication. I'll check if we can say it like that. But that sounds like like to them. It just sounds like you're using the proper words, I think, and we get rid of electro polished. Yeah, perfect. Okay, cool, excellent. Okay, so that is good. We can reduce, get rid of that. No, I get rid of anything that can. I don't want, if you've got it in the system, then the AI is going to use it occasionally.

Speaker 6  31:00
And we don't want that to happen, so that's why I'm just making sure. So it's 304 for normal,

Lisa Galea  31:08
and 306 there. That is perfect. So this is really it's just there occasionally, if we need to use them and put them in, like in the catalog or anything. It's just, this is what you're using if we need to have social proof for these people. Do you know what I mean? It's like, these are the things that these people give a shit about. Most importantly, right? So that is for builders. I Okay, so that is good. Now see where else we can at the top the values. Okay, so this was your existing values. So I put what your what it was, and then it was like, Okay, what does this really mean? What you were doing in your concepts. Then I was like, from their point of view, what did they give a shit about? So we again, had that crafted with care, which basically is like, I prevent harm. So yeah, that's what they care about. Compliance. I they they care, confidence, under scrutiny, human design. So that was the first, anyway. So I did the first brand. I'm going to go down to the ones I liked. Okay, yeah, get it. I thought these were it regulatory, without refill, we build to the highest global standards. Before you ask, because order readiness shouldn't be retrofitted, is that feels like good.

Speaker 1  32:51
It doesn't sound like us, but it's saying what we want it to say,

Lisa Galea  32:57
okay, then, then I think, Okay, let's look, then what I what I would do with because when I'm like, doing my values, obviously they're pretty important, like to really everything, as weird as that is. So I'm saying that really, if you were doing that, what's our behavior? So your behavior would be, every audit ships with an audit file, so you would give it, you know how you were saying, you send that spec. You would just say, we've checked this. You do a check at the end of every job. I'm assuming you

Speaker 1  33:26
would, yeah, we do a call. Our quality assurance process, I think has a final sign off, yeah.

Lisa Galea  33:32
So what you would do is make up, like a fake one that becomes the audit file, so where they've done the quality assurance you send them the sheet to say, this is what we send you. So you know, it's all done, and that becomes obviously automated, but that's really like showing how your behavior to people we care about the checking. Do you know what I mean? So we can look at this. You're thinking, this is okay, but not in the right words, and we're just gonna put that in, I think so, yeah, we read it honestly again. These aren't going to be like, we're not gonna get stuck on them, but I think you should look through them. That's why I put here. What I did was the first ones, what we cared about. Then I was like,

34:24
how are we going to say this?

Lisa Galea  34:27
And then I'm like, All right, go hard, my friend. I'm not very I'm still not happy. This is what I think. Okay, so we've got ergonomics with empathy. So high, adjust benches, zero reach zones, light where you need it, designed to protect your team from fatigue, strain and burnout. Sounds good. I mean, you wouldn't have to have that all as one. It was just like, This is how we so if you said ergonomic with empathy, you could just put designed to protect your team with fatigue, strike and burnout. If we were. Talking to the builders, to the team, the manager man, to see what I mean. He cares about that. So really you could change it, but you are caring when you're making stuff. That's really what I thought that said. So there's no what you do is there's no shortcuts, no visible worlds, visible rejection. So we don't actually electropolis. So I think then again, so these, I really, even though values are important, they are, like you said, personal. So you go through and just check the words, I think you can do that, rather than us mess around on this one. Yeah, because you go through and think, but really it's about your external focus. Remember, they don't I mean, this is why, like, no one gives a shit, I'm curious. Why is that a benefit to them? Even though curiosity is my value, I judge people if they're not curious, right? So it is important to me, but no one really cares about me. It's like, well, it's important because Lisa goes down rabbit holes for you, and she doesn't get it if she can't see all the picture. And so that is a benefit for you, right? Yeah, so that that's why you've got to think they don't care about curiosity, but they care about the benefits. So you just think about that when you're looking and what is what's tricky is you've written in there's really two perspectives. Yours are like from the CUSP for your team, but I still don't think for your team, they're remembering that. No, they're too random, like and they don't really, if you think about it, and that's even with her design on them, fired up. If you said we're fired up, we're flexible and we are, like, flowing, right? They can remember that, but green and gold doesn't even make sense with flexible. Like they're not the same. Like flexible is an adjective, green and gold doesn't make sense. Yeah. Do you see what I mean? So you would want to have them really the max they're going to remember three. Okay, you're only allowed two when you do the Brene Brown training, and it's really hard to get to two, but I think for your team, get these sorted, right, and then we'll work them back, for the team backwards, okay? Because I think the our external is more important for how you're communicating to them. And, you know, partnership, not product solving spaces, not just supplying units. You might just prefer in that, because that's actually saying what you're from. Me looking at this, this is what I from and all your documents. This is what I think you're saying. You're right, you're right. So I think this is actually the words you're saying in your documents. This is a bit boxy, so I would start here, and then you go through and say, Yeah, we like it in this way. We like those words and what you say, okay, but they're all but I think that's it. And I thought the craft of with care really, we don't have to have in our values, because it's our brand promise. Yeah. So that's why, when I was trying to cut them down, I thought you can get rid of crafted with care, because even though it's really important, it's actually our brand promise, it's already there. Yeah, it's already there. Like this, this is there and have a look at these behaviors. So I did think that like CO design, not catalog, so I would still go with partnership, not product. So solving space is not just supplying units, right? I think that's a nice way of saying it. But then what it's suggesting you would do, and what I would think is saying you care, is the first thing you do is a needs analysis, which is what I do for my customers, is like, we need to know what you need, and then we can actually tell you how we can help you, right? So you just build in, like, a 40 minute workflow mapping call, just to make sure that, like, well one it normally saves you on actually quoting on dickhead shit, right? It's like we need to have that meeting because, you know we are, and actually makes, I think when I say to people, it makes other people who've quoted with no fucking information that like dickheads, yeah, because it's like, how did you give a quote when I don't even know what you want? So that Ford and that 45 minute call, I think really can make it clear for you whether you can be asked doing it, whether it's worthwhile, because quotes take a long time in my brain. Yeah. So that could be. Something, you would put it in, and you would sell it as a needs analysis. And I think those questions would elevate you immediately, because no one else is actually asking, Okay, so where you want to make sure they they do good. I mean, the fair dealings. I don't like, I don't think you need to say you're honest. I'm like, Who the fuck is saying they're not honest? It's a given, mate. It's a given. If you're not honest, we're fucked, right? So honest is like, please don't when people say I'm honest, I really care about honesty, and also it is so beset. It's such a contextual perception. Like, I can say I'm honest and you can say you're honest, but we both have completely different ideas of what honest means. Alright, so you go through and have a look at what you think, but really try to get them down to like three, three, because it's that's easy for humans to remember. So what is really important to you guys on these are what we will, I would say for them, they should be things that you will not compromise on. Like it's not ever going to be like if I, if I, if I work with someone like raptors, right? He's a dick, and I'm fine with that, but not if he hurt other humans? Because that is actually my value on, like, if you start talking about other humans like you're less, I just can't deal with that shit, right? So that is my value on curiosity and really kindness. But it's it's more you treat others as everyone is equal in this world. I don't think there's anyone less. So if I see that behavior that is unacceptable to me, so that's how I know they're my values, because that really triggers me. So what will you not? You know, like, I think you do really give a shit, right? And I think you really do care, like you really are thinking about the people. Are you going to give a shit that it's custom the first time? We might take that out and just move that to like we're going to just say this when we talk to builders, yeah, because is that something you do care but is it something you really care about? No, that's where you got to think about. It's like, I don't think you, you know, if it didn't happen, it wouldn't be the end of the world, but it would be the end of the world if something you did hurt some other person. Yes, you would really give a shit. So I think that helps you, like that to build a thing, helps us get rid of them straight away. So really, because I do think as well, this is your dad and your mom. Yeah, in terms of this is like, what you give a shit about, really, for the business. So they are personal, but they do drive a lot, and it will also help when you're getting team members the next if you're replacing a debt or any, any, anybody you're bringing on the team, once you're really clear on these values, it actually makes decisions in the company so much easier. Yeah, because you go, does it actually do this? This? Does it actually are we making this choice? Hood is always the best for the person for safety, if it's actually solving this problem, this is the most important problem that we always make sure that we do okay. So that's why I'd say this. I think values are important. But I really did think you might want to talk to your dad and your mom and say, Okay, this is what we care about, how we communicating this, because it should be our voice. But I hopefully I've given you a better way of thinking of them and getting them narrowed down, and you can have the long version that you might have in your like, business plan, really, and I have that version, and then I have is, like, how I'm talking to my team is how we show our behaviors, How we show our values, because that's what matters, not Oh, these are my company values. Who cares? How do we behave? To show them, because that's when they become integrated into the way people think, and that's when you can start elevating your team. Yeah. Okay, so they are in. Really is important to get people who care about that shit. It matters, and it's something that if you get them on board with you, like my team, give a shit about my shit, by my values, that I can see their behaviors, even Felicity with her music. She's got the same values as me, different beliefs, same values. So. It really is key good to have different beliefs, but not different values. Alright, so I want you to look through those with them. Excellent. So we have done the vision. We have done that. The one page positioner is I will now go in and just update it, because that's really just the copying of stuff of what we've just done. So I just wanted to finish that off. And the same, oh, that was just the color pretty one. These were the documents I am building out then on how we're talking to each one from our targets, okay? And then you've got, like, the verbal identity would be, I who exactly we talking to, and then obviously we're going to have to make sure we put the words in

Speaker 1  45:50
this, yeah. That'll be really handy for a debt with the socials,

Lisa Galea  45:54
yeah. And this is really, like, again, like, really, what's handy is it's a lot for any human to deal with, right? But if she can put it into the if we can get a bot doing it, that's where I see it works. Because she's like, Oh, I'm writing to the builders. See, okay, we want the core message is this. And then this is really, like, mandatory elements of what I've got to be in there. And this is the proof of what we do, right? So this is that this will be if you're talking to them, and this is really what is saying you should have ready to send out. So I am putting this in. This is our tone of voice, but again, so it will have the don't say, do says, so don't say we're clinical, say we were your trusted partner. Again, I'll go and update this now from our final This is how we want to talk about this. Yeah, okay, so that's why I've gone through so there'll be for each one we'll do it's really two languages. One's a hospital, one's the builders at this point. But then what about the distributors? Is worrying me, because it's like they only arrived on Wednesday last week, a hospital. So they care that you are providing stuff. What the hospital wants is really important.

Speaker 1  47:16
They just want to know anything they buy off us is going to be good for the end user, and they make their cream on top. Yeah,

Lisa Galea  47:22
yeah. Okay, cool. So they don't actually care, like, in that way, yes, yeah, good. Okay. That's why I was like, oh my god, do we have to write another one that I have to have another segment

Speaker 1  47:32
thing, I think the medical or the hospital talks to the distributors as well. Good, yeah. Alright.

Lisa Galea  47:40
So the let me actually, that's where I've got. I'm thinking, where's that list I made? Here is so I went through. That's why I was like, okay, we can choose right now if I think we need we've said the brand guidelines are done, right? Yes, pretty much. We've chosen everything. They're pretty much done. Yeah, they're pretty much done. Then we did you add those spec sheets that I needed, you know, for them, so that if you do a spec sheet, it's always organized. We spoke about that last time. No, that's what I have to say. Just do them in that's fine. We'll add them in the capability statement. I think we can. I think that is important that you have that set

Speaker 1  48:28
up. I do think so then end up before Hong Kong.

Lisa Galea  48:32
I think you do. And I think it's also going through this copy now, like, now we're saying, Okay, I know, like, what you've what you've given me, is enough, I think, to say, Okay, now I know I can cross off here, but this is almost like, it's almost like you're

Speaker 2  48:53
it's a little like a bragging about ourselves, almost like saying, Hey, we can do this,

Lisa Galea  48:58
like we have. I think they, have to, yes, they have to do a capability statement. Do you mean they understand them? So it's really, we're making it more of a sales brochure, but that's what they are, exactly. That's what they are. So I think that's a yes. The spec sheets, would you be asked for them before the conference?

Speaker 2  49:19
No. Spec sheets are more. They've ordered the product. That's a nice to have. They need it in their like, the builders checklist.

Lisa Galea  49:35
I'm not gonna, I'm not going to even think about that then, because that's like, got to be done. That

49:39
doesn't need to be it needs to be done. But not, yeah,

Lisa Galea  49:43
no, urgent, so I'm going to get off. So, yeah, the token is specs pack, though, that is really what I need to make for the that's a knowledge basis, okay, so that's like for you to be able to

Speaker 6  49:55
ask the questions. Um.

Lisa Galea  49:59
Just, she's on,

50:05
I guess, just the website.

Lisa Galea  50:07
Oh yeah, website, website makeover. This was where,

50:11
just that home page, that

Lisa Galea  50:13
home page, and what about then the, do we do the slide deck. Or, do you think, I mean, that you're, do you think that you could sort this out, the copy, and then from like, if I'm working on the capability, I feel like what we've got in there, we should be able to flip over to here pretty quick, into there. Yeah, and really, what it's saying, what we what I worked out was, it's only seven. It's only page seven, where you would be saying, see the Kate the case study. You would change that up depending on the builder or the you know, do you see what I mean? It's like, we want to try and make it that. It's like, this is the deck. They're the same, but we've changed certain slides, yeah. Like, what we want is proof is going to be different for the builder that they're going to have, like, that's going to be the hospital when they're going to care about longevity. The builders want a story about timelines and late change rescue, yeah, yeah. So that's it. Really I have planned that I'm just thinking, I don't if I start, if I start doing the capability, the deck, and that, I'm like, I won't be able to build your dollar basis. So it's like, what is more important to me personally? I'm like, get the bloody knowledge base. Ai shit off me, because that's long term useful. Yeah, do you see what I mean? But then they've we got this organized. That's why I was like, Okay, I've got a designer on. I thought she was meant to do this, your designer. But I'm like, have a thing. She'll freak out. She will freak out. I don't think she's I even looked to the website. I was like, she's not going to do that. She's not going to make it. Like she might make the website. I think that's all we can give her, yeah, because she seemed to be she was like, Are you going to give me the header numbers? I was like, No, you're a designer. Like, you're going to tell me what they are once you've set it up, yeah? Like, I've told you the fonts I've guessed like, but go check like, make it. Do you know me? So we've got this. I'm thinking, do you want? I have got my designer, and she's shit low, cheaper than your people in Sydney. And I'm like, do you want this extra shit made up. That's what I was thinking last night. Like the template the spec sheet, will make a list of what she actually needs to do, and I'll get a price on it. Because I think you said again,

Speaker 1  52:53
would she be able to do the website? Because I feel like Odette could do the spec sheet and stuff. It's not as complicated.

Lisa Galea  53:09
I know, but the problem is, I don't think she's doing the website. It's a shame, because it isn't. It's like, if debt does it, she's going to spend two weeks, maybe three, wanking around with a website that isn't even your website. It's a pretend one, like it's you've already building another one in the back. Do you know what I mean? I'm like, Oh my God, I feel just like, please don't spend Yeah. I'm like, please don't spend three weeks doing something that's useless, that would upset me, right? That upsets me. So that's where I'm thinking, is like, which one should I do? Okay, that's where I'm like, judging or what one's important. You're saying the website is that important. And in one

Speaker 1  53:53
way, I think out of that list, that's not already done, I think the capability statement and the front page of the website, yeah, to be the prior two priorities. Yeah, the personas

Lisa Galea  54:08
and yeah, it's what I thought. I mean, that was like, I got her on it my designer last night, right? Because I was like, that's my job anyway, to provide them for you. So she's just doing work I needed to pay for. And also because I think she needs to see them to understand what I'm going to ask her to do next, to do, yeah, right. So I was hoping, I was like, Okay, if you, if you do those, we'll get somewhere where we're like, you'll hopefully be on job, right? So that is good. She's done a it's quite good. It's so lovely working in Adobe. I don't know why a decks in Canva don't make any sense at all, because you've got everything in Adobe. Yeah, right. So also, when I did this deck last night, I thought, okay, cool. So I'm started trying to think this is how your decks look, right?

54:57
So. So I thought it's a lot more professional than what we've

Lisa Galea  55:01
Yeah, that's what I thought. So I jumped in, because obviously they she doesn't give me that back either. She gives me shit, like, didn't have this on the edges and stuff. So I was like, This is how I want it to look. And really, I said, Go and do the a four so it looks similar, and we'll just keep this sort of gritty thing, because I think they like it. It is that I think even all of you're an enjt, you're a manufacturing company. So that's why I thought the gritty thing sort of like a separate voice. It sort of got awkward. Where do you put the information? It's actually a bit tricky, but really, this would be just like, this is for your internal records. And really, if you had a new sales person come out today, like, Odet, should know this, this is part of your ongoing really, if you're Yeah, it's like, this is what he wants to know. Like, this is what this guy cares about. If he's a builder, he doesn't want delays. He wants it to be compliant, and he wants someone who works with him and understands the industry. Do you know what? I mean, that's all he really cares about. So now we know that, as a salesperson, how you talking to him, that's what he's thinking about at night time, which, again, all of this is, again, in the bot, so that when she's writing social media. I mean, I've got it. That's why now it's like it's all in the bot. For me, I've already done this. And already done this and read it. I don't need to see this. But I did think this is useful for I was thinking this is quite useful for the design, because that, to me, felt like, yeah, we can use that. We can start using that as a template, because that's what we want, something that will work on all of it. Yeah, and your logos is actually quite powerful. I quite like the red in this. When I did that last night, I was like, that, that's nice. I thought that looked quite good. It's like, it sort of softens it down without going pink. Yes, which is the major issue is we got the pink, and then you've got the surgical steel, which does actually add in that extra color, makes it a lot easier for her to do the design. Yeah, we're still not using shades, but I'm not sure. Like, I don't think that should be in yellow. That is only for safety. Yes. Okay, so that's, I mean, I'll go through this, but it was almost like, when I was doing this, I was like, I think we're making a deck. I think the capabilities deck is almost done if I sort of wiggle with this. Yeah, looks really good. So that's up to you. I was like, so we look and I'll see what's left. Like, I'll go through that. But I'm, I'm feeling she's, you could have it done in like three weeks. All the other shit, rather than you waiting for a debt to catch up. And I'm just like, even I think it's going to take her. I think she needs some serious help with the website. Oh yes, she needs help with the design on it, even if I don't do it. I don't

58:01
want to do it, but she needs some guidance. She

Lisa Galea  58:03
needs and not just yet. She needs to be layout designed. When I looked at

Speaker 1  58:08
it, Lisa, that's supposed to be her specialty. She's supposed to be a graphic university trained graphic designer with almost 10 years experience.

Lisa Galea  58:19
But I don't think, I think she doesn't have any idea on content.

Speaker 4  58:26
She doesn't do any she doesn't do any research, no decision making. She will only do what you tell her to do.

Lisa Galea  58:33
Well, she did ask me that because I was like, go do it. That's your job. Is just to do that. Change those fonts, because I don't want to see the fonts on there, right? Yeah.

58:43
And, I mean, I given her this

Lisa Galea  58:49
so I was like, it's pretty

58:53
and they have enough. That's all it's I mean, I

Lisa Galea  58:55
think that's a brand guide. I'm like, there it is, mate, I don't understand that you need more than a brown guide, like I've done it, and here tells you why I've chosen their colors. We're not guessing. I don't guess colors, right? So I hope that that would understand. I also think for your team, that's why it's like, it's good for them to know, oh, we use this because that makes them happy. Yeah, right. So it, it helps understand better for them. But, I mean, I thought that it's pretty much done in my brain. I was like, that, that's enough.

Speaker 1  59:25
That's all the information we need to make the updates right

Lisa Galea  59:29
now, exactly, exactly. That's all you need for updates. And that's what the that's why all this stuff. So she's not thinking about any of this is she. And then she was like, who's going to give do I have to show it to James? I mean, that's still the problem, though. Look what she's done. That doesn't look like my work, does it?

Speaker 1  59:50
No, that looks like the debts.

Lisa Galea  59:54
That's why these are cheap designers, my friend. You. Yes, that's the problem, which is fine, because I'm used to her, right? That's why I feel like even you left there is not ever going to look like I did it. No, so why? Because it's like this one I did. I started this off last night. I mean, she's why?

Speaker 6  1:00:16
Because I was just showing her this, because it was, I was tired. Had two meetings last night. It's like 12 o'clock at night,

Lisa Galea  1:00:24
and I'm feeling like the actual, definitely, the is even that, doing that, and the red and the, I mean, all the colors. See, she's lost the plot completely. It did not even look that bad because I actually left it should look more like that. That's what I gave her. Was like, the one pager. It should look like a resume, right? So my brain, but then I was like, add this bit on the side so that they match your all your work, this most tripped out thing I've ever seen. So I mean, obviously that's the problem with Indian girl, but she's, I have mentored her for like, two years. She has studied social she's fascinating. She's actually one of my mentees. She started off just as a mentee. I just met her online. She's fascinating because she studied sociology at uni and she taught herself to be a designer. Oh, wow, I know. And she ran away from it. Well, she left her husband, which I think in India,

Speaker 4  1:01:25
is pretty all those, pretty much, yeah, she

Lisa Galea  1:01:28
got matched, and he took her out to the village or somewhere, and then she just learned to be a designer and started working to get away from it. So I met her through that story, and then I realized, like, oh. And then, really, I've helped her, but, yeah, she needs elevating, but she's does what she's told, and she, you know, learns this good, really, right now, I just need someone to wank around and tell them what to do. So I was like, this looks shit. I will show one. And then it's like, make that into other pages, because I don't have time for that, and I feel like you would get it done in the three weeks. I feel like even if it went I felt I was like, if you don't do that, if you don't do that, it's like, when would get done?

Speaker 1  1:02:13
Yeah, and how it's, how much are you talking like? It's like, how

Lisa Galea  1:02:17
talking fuck all, compared to, like, what you've been quoted for from the design place. So I'm, like, I was thinking, like, this couldn't be max five, Max. I'm

1:02:28
thinking that's a really expensive work. Yeah,

Lisa Galea  1:02:32
that's with me telling her what to do. She's way cheaper than like, yeah, she's way cheaper than me. That's allowing me telling her what to do, yeah? So she would be like, to be honest about she's about 1200 Max a week in cost. But then if you let her do shit, it'll turn to crap. So basically, like, I'm thinking, yeah, if I put in some hours just telling her what to do. I'm thinking the max it would be is that it's not that much you have to do, and I've already designed it, but it is time. It is time. Like it will take time for her to do those spec sheets. Yeah, even the capability I'm thinking we should throw under there, because really, I'm still going to be the creative director on it, and I think physically, she's the one physically doing, which is really the thing that is my hold back, is that and I could then do the thing. I think we need design. Because when I even looked at it, I was like, Oh my God, she's got a lot to do on that was the website. I know how the capability looks already. It's already done in my brain, right? So it's easy. I'm not feeling that on the website, no, because then I was also, I'm also with this girl. I can tell her like she just watched me last night. She loves learning. That's why I like her. She's so curious. Her questions are fantastic. She cares about the person. She really does because she's got sociology. I didn't realize that. I was like, why are you asking such cool questions? Because most designers don't give a shit about this, and that's what makes you good, is caring. So I think in this like, we gotta get rid of that crafted for care and what that's about, like, it shouldn't be there. So we will get that. So you are just a solid, big logo.

Speaker 1  1:04:21
We need to be a lot more confident in our logo.

Lisa Galea  1:04:24
Yeah, I'm I actually it's in Elementor. So there is one bonus. It's not my favorite theme, but I use it.

1:04:32
I just was like, it's so bad the spacing.

Lisa Galea  1:04:38
I wondered if she'd done it for mobile, but does it really improve? No, I was like, oh, maybe she did mobile first, which is the right way to do it. It didn't improve, does it? And I just don't know if we left her to that. She even changed the fonts. Because, I mean, when did I see her on Thursday? I think she has, yeah, she has, alright. So she's gone. That's not being changed. So she's gone in there, and that's what we changed. I can see that. So I She's already gone in here to fix this.

1:05:13
Remember? Oh, goodness, yeah. Okay, so

Lisa Galea  1:05:16
that's what I'm just thinking. She's been in here to fix, because this is already better. And look at the sizes. This is what's freaking me out, is the this is what's freaking me out, is like, her hierarchy, there's so many different sizes, and it's like, these are the most important things on your thing, yeah, yeah,

1:05:42
strip with all the ISO and stuff,

Lisa Galea  1:05:45
yeah, that's what I that should be the first thing we see as a row under here.

Speaker 1  1:05:51
Yeah. So how I'm just thinking,

Lisa Galea  1:05:56
just saying, Are we giving her a job that's not even possible. We give her, that's what I'm that's why I wanted to talk to you guys today, because I was

Speaker 1  1:06:03
like, setting her up to fail, because I don't think she has the skill set to actually do what's needed. No.

Lisa Galea  1:06:08
And I'm thinking even if I gave her, if I gave her a design of

Speaker 4  1:06:15
this, if you gave her a mock of this, but

Lisa Galea  1:06:19
then why she left it like this? That don't make sense, because look at her rose like, does she not that's what's scaring me. Is the WEP build like is the gridness is actually worrying me more than the content, because the contents like, not really her fault.

Speaker 4  1:06:37
Yeah. Can we give her, like, I

Lisa Galea  1:06:41
feel like, but if I went in template grid thing, that's what I'm thinking, it'd be quicker for me to go in and, like, build fix this page, yeah, rather than me making a design of the page, and then we've gotta go and get her to do it. I'm thinking, if she could do it, why has she left those headings like that? Because if I've gone through and said I didn't put her in a blaming way, I was like, We gotta go and fix this. Blah, blah, blah. If someone's gone in and fix that already

Speaker 1  1:07:15
and left it like that, yeah, I just don't think she has the skill set or the or the understanding of the level of expectation.

Lisa Galea  1:07:28
That's why That's what we're saying. She's not she's not looked at like what you're meant to look like, No, and that's what she needs to do to really like, I've been, I mean, I already, I spent an hour and a half showing my designer all the websites of your competition like, and then I'm like, do the avatars for me, because then you will know who you're talking to. Because that is key. If we don't get that, you're going to be useless.

Speaker 1  1:07:53
Yeah, I really like when you did that long brand identity with the look and feel.

Lisa Galea  1:08:00
I thought, yeah, she's excellent stylescapes. My one, she's, she's actually really good at logos, right?

Speaker 1  1:08:09
That could be, that would be really good for Odette, because she can look at this page and go, Oh, that doesn't look like what the identity is supposed to look like,

Lisa Galea  1:08:18
Yeah, but I don't know. Is she gonna get that? Because look at it,

Speaker 1  1:08:21
no, but we're not. So at least, do you think you have the capacity to redo that home page?

Lisa Galea  1:08:33
Yeah, I really, I'm thinking, because it depends if I don't do other things. Yes. Do you see what I mean? I'm like, which one is the most important? And I'm really think I mean, looking at that and thinking she's changed her fonts has scared me. And I just feel you could say to her, like, I am way quicker, right? I'm much quicker than this.

Speaker 1  1:08:54
And I think we just go with the angle of every single person who doesn't know who we are at this world conference is going to go to our website, and we need that to look even.

Lisa Galea  1:09:05
I mean, even they're not even going to get a capability statement first, are they? They're going to get this. They are going to check you out, and this is not okay,

Speaker 1  1:09:14
yeah, that's why I'm thinking this over capability statement. Yeah,

Lisa Galea  1:09:22
what do we then? Okay, what we've got to use a debt to do is getting, like, the most important pictures for me, that is for this, or even you guys would know, what is the most important pictures? Like, I don't want to be looking through photographs, because that's probably going

Speaker 1  1:09:41
to be we actually have some professional images that look quite

Lisa Galea  1:09:46
nice. So I want you to show

1:09:48
red short lead time. This should not be on the front page. Looks

Speaker 1  1:09:53
like it's at the Reject Shop and someone's. 100, I know. Yeah, sorry, that's being rude, but

Lisa Galea  1:10:00
yeah, that's what you look like. It's actually not you look like Harvey Norman sailing. That's why we're like, we're going to bunny. We don't want to be that. We want to be a completely different level. So it's a redesign, and that's why I'm like, but the problem is, we're redesigning something that we're not even

Speaker 1  1:10:18
using at least. I think we will be using this for at least six to 12 months, because the new website is nowhere near and she's just showing me the UK portal, and it's yellow.

Lisa Galea  1:10:31
So, yeah, okay, no, yeah, yeah, and whatever I do here, honestly, should be a bloody copy,

Speaker 2  1:10:40
yeah, and she'll be able to take those same themes, hopefully over into the

Lisa Galea  1:10:46
next section, yeah. And also, I think then we need some she needs to it like one. You've got to decide what, what she's going to do and where she's going to work. Why is your mom falling out with her? She's not like that. Why is your mom said, Fuck it.

Speaker 1  1:11:01
Because mum, mum was basically doing her job and doing her job for her, except for physically clicking and dragging,

1:11:09
dragging and dropping.

Lisa Galea  1:11:10
That's what I feel like, something to do. Yeah, 100%

Speaker 1  1:11:20
don't worry. I we're going to do a restructure, and Odette is not going to be around so much longer, because she's not, she's not growing with the state that we the business is growing, growing.

Lisa Galea  1:11:34
Yeah, she's not. Well also, do you know what it is, she doesn't care. See her value of care, which is what we're saying is the most important thing to your

1:11:48
company, is you care.

Lisa Galea  1:11:49
Yeah, that's right. And so you need to have someone who aligns with your value, who cares so when she hasn't

Speaker 2  1:11:55
even bothered to learn anything that's about what we do or where our stuff

Lisa Galea  1:12:02
I know, yeah, okay, that's no good. That is, and that is all you need to make sure is you get someone who cares, like I'm interviewing people now, and I don't care what they do, because I know I can teach them that, yeah, but I can't teach them to care. I can't teach them to be curious. Like denominators, like, doesn't come in the thing. So, all right, well, one thing this last, have you guys got time for me to go through? One more thing, yeah, yep, that is good. It's like, I have got one thing I did, I did go through from a strategy point of view. There is some information we could give your dad, but I did think as well we could

1:12:49
put those in the marketing.

1:12:56
That was when we were doing the check.

Lisa Galea  1:12:59
There was actually names. I think it might have been where we were just before there was actually things in there where you could have, we can actually make, like, mini brands, mini brands. Let me show you, and then it will make sense. If those words were all those words that I had for you,

1:13:24
hundreds of these stupid words, rank or vision,

Lisa Galea  1:13:31
one was here, so see how this will make sense. Human Engineering by Emory, engineered for humans, made for hospitals, right? So you name your process. So we've got, like, the Emory co Design Lab, and that's where you do your workflow mapping mock ups, right? Then you have the Emory audit file. This is your specs and stuff, right? So you start actually naming so like your signature line is the Emory Ergo compliance system. So it's got the modules for PrEP decon. So this is sort of like saying underneath Emery, you would have these systems, but they're really systems to explain immediately what you do. Yeah, okay, so I've just put them there for an idea. Because I was like, I would think about that. Because I was like, the clean line is quite a good name for range. I did quite like that one where infection

Speaker 1  1:14:40
stops. I like that one because one of our competitors is called Smart line. Yeah.

Lisa Galea  1:14:44
So like the clean line, it's like, and then even writing at the end. I don't think you need the TM, but human engineering, human earring by Emory. Is, like, we're engineering for humans. Quite like, I was like, I quite like that, because it is a point of difference. You see, like, I'm going to remember that over you saying to me, I care. Could you be like, human earring. Oh, that's clever. Oh, you're engineering for humans. Yeah, I get it. So I'm just saying, I think the CO design lab as well, I liked that is saying, because when what we're saying they're afraid of is the process of dealing with you in Australia. So you'd be like, we start with the Emory. You always are dealing with the Emory co Design Lab, like your work goes straight in there, and we do the workflow mapping, blah, blah, blah, and that's where you've always got that person who's the point of contact for your co design, yeah, but it's sort of like saying the process, and then we know, then at the end, it does the audit, and we all send it, and it comes with the audit file, and it's been checked before it's packaged. Because how often do we have shit come from China that no one's even checked the box? Yeah, exactly. I mean, I got sent a whole new desk because I forgot one part, right? Because they're so shit. I don't think they even undo a box. Like, who even knows if there's a factory, they just send out another one. And then I got the builder to fix it right? So you can see those little things again. I think is something you should look through and have a thing, because they're easy things for you to then explain. See Emery co Design Lab. You don't have to explain what that is. That's where you go. If you want to have shit design on custom design, and no one else has got one, so you become a bit more like that's what we're just trying to separate you from the pack. And people love a process, yeah. Okay, so put you on there, and I will put on Helena. So are you already on? You already on here? You have access to everything. I think on here. Can I share my screen for a second? Yep, I'm going to stop sharing. And that's got your values document on there as well. Allow that's good. I'll do a little flick where there's all those words. Here we go. Next one down.

Speaker 1  1:17:18
So this is a stainless steel manufacturer that we actually do small jobs for, and this is their website.

Lisa Galea  1:17:29
Oh, goodness, the sheet metal.

Speaker 1  1:17:33
Okay, yeah, and they've got what we do at the top, and it's no, there's no products.

Lisa Galea  1:17:47
Oh, 100% like, you don't need

Speaker 1  1:17:50
these people, like a lot of these people we do work for already. So, like, built and built Corp and whatnot. But they they call design and construct laser cutting. They've got their sheet metal, if they've got the CAD drafting, which is what we've got, they've got their custom products, and they contact us. Yeah, I just think the way, like, how this website speaks to you, with the little CAD drawing on the side over here and the picture and whatnot is, is kind of what we're wanting to go down lesser online catalog. Oh, 100%

Lisa Galea  1:18:32
we not. We need to get away from online catalog immediately with that, like, definitely not who you are. I actually looked at builds website because theirs is very nice, yeah, and they're really smart one, I think again, what they've done are pretty much how a website should be done. That's why I'm wondering if she has website skills, because you'd have the introducing header with the two buttons, the choice, then you've got social proof immediately of all the companies you've worked for. And then you've got what you do in terms of benefit to the client. They don't give a shit about your products. They care about what you do for them, which is the things they want to know you've done that. Yep, that's all should be next. So that's really how we want to lay yours out. I'm thinking, and then it's like, this is why you should work with us. That just what I mean. So that's really they're just talking to the client, which is correct. So, yeah, I'm we need to change our I'm on the total same page as you. That's why I'm sort of nervous. I'm 100% on the same page. I think this looks too to me, that still doesn't look they still look like they are mid level in a small company.

1:19:45
Yes, and we want to give the person

Lisa Galea  1:19:48
I think you want to look higher than you want to fit in with to build. Yeah. Because bill doesn't build has that net if we're just me, just look at that. Because I remember looking at that again the other night, because it's a nice design. They've always been ahead. We want to look like professionals. Yeah, you want to look like professionals. And that's what you know. National is everything, and that's not the right one build. I know you mean the build?

1:20:18
Is it made by build? No, build by design.

Lisa Galea  1:20:27
Yeah, you definitely like, don't stress, my friend, because I'm with you on looking professional, and I agree totally that that website is no good website, like, what we're talking let me think, okay, because it's like, a website redesign.

Speaker 6  1:20:43
Yeah, it's another project. Is another project.

Lisa Galea  1:20:48
It's another project. That's why it's like, I can me fixing that front page is not going to be a website doesn't redesign that, I think you need, okay? So that's probably really what I want to be upfront with. I can do a website for three like, in the three weeks, I can make that look good. It's like having a makeover, right? We can't we just pretty ourselves up, right? That's

1:21:09
fine, yeah, just raise your Yeah.

Lisa Galea  1:21:12
And I will reduce to look like that. I will read shoes to look professional, and I'll put the logos in, because you've got them in there. They're just going to be spaced out and looked. I can do that, but I feel like it actually needs like you're saying to be designed properly, so that you actually know.

Speaker 1  1:21:30
And that might be a conversation for next year, ladies, because while we're building the new website. Instead of it getting double handled, we might once we let Odette go, it might be worth paying you whatever it costs for your team and just get the website done properly.

1:21:48
The new website, if they can do ODU in ODU, I you

Lisa Galea  1:21:59
don't do websites. It's wrong. I don't do websites. But like, honestly, like, I have got, no, I have, well, I've got, like, I've got a girl who I think is amazing. She's an ex lawyer in Melbourne. She's doing my new rust work. I want her to take over all my websites, right? Because I got five of my own. So yes, I have teams, and I do think that you need someone in terms of creative direction. I think I WEP a website like a website girl who does them, because, to be honest, it is like me saying I'm not a Website Builder. I can do design and make them look

Speaker 1  1:22:34
pretty. But if you told a website maker, we need

Lisa Galea  1:22:38
so you need someone who's telling her what to do, like I did say. She's like, Oh, do I have to show it to James? And I was like, No, I'll take the brunt and just tell James I'm the designer, not him. Yes, well, I don't know why James is telling you how to design. I'll take the brunt. It's my responsibility. Because he was like, do we have to ask? And I was like, Well, I don't ask my clients. They pay me to do my job, and I know what I'm doing. Yeah, yes. And I think that's what you need, and you need at least you're not going to get ripped off. Then that's the difference. It's like what we can get, what you're going to get for $5,000 from an Indian lady, if I'm even if it was $10,000 we can get the whole $87,000 spec for 10,000 if I'm directing, but the high risk is you can't use a 10,000 girl without me. No, she'll just give you that shit in multi colors. Yes, that's why you'll end up with a yellow page too, even though I've said they're only for safety. I mean, I've told them both that, so I will, let's have a think about that, because I really need because I know you want

Speaker 1  1:23:46
the AI, it's been updated. It's not yellow anymore. It's now gray. Okay, good, good, good. This is, this is the front page of the UK portal, which is where we're currently talking to a huge distributor over there. This has not gone live to them yet, but this is it. It looks better. Oh, definitely looks better. And she's taken what you've told her, and she's started to fix this up before people,

Lisa Galea  1:24:12
yeah, she did. That's definitely better than what I saw the other day, again, because it's like, it's again, just showing your products. There's no sell, yeah?

Speaker 1  1:24:27
This is purely a online catalog, yeah, and that's what we want it to

Lisa Galea  1:24:32
be. But even with a catalog, you would have the first page saying, buy now, like this is why you buy off this catalog. Like there's more information on it, and even on a sale, even on every single product page, there should be a quote from someone, a testimonial, there should be a reason of why you buy it, the social proof. Proof your guys care that some like you could have so easily, as seen in these hospitals on nearly every one of these pages. And as soon as they know someone else has bought it, they will feel so much better about it. Yeah, that is one of their big things, is actually knowing that someone else has bought it makes them feel safe. So if they're thinking it's like me, if I was like, Oh well, if they're buying it, I know it must be good. It just doesn't mean it's always true, but that social proof should be on every single product page. Yeah, that we would just drag in. Do you know what I mean? And that's why I feel like you would want someone to redesign it, because otherwise we're wasting everyone's time what she's doing, yes? Well, that's

Speaker 1  1:25:43
the thing. That's why I'm feeling bad. She's on a she's on a good wicket, and we're not getting, like, what is

Lisa Galea  1:25:49
she getting paid per week?

Speaker 1  1:25:50
She's on 85 grand a year. Oh, off.

Lisa Galea  1:25:54
You can give me that and I will give that to like, I wouldn't even have to give that to my Indian girl, and you would have a better job.

1:26:00
Yeah, yeah, that's ridiculous. Yeah, that's ridiculous,

Lisa Galea  1:26:06
because she should care. And also that, did you need someone who? Yeah, that's, that is the biggest thing. That's a problem then, right? But it's she's okay at design if she was told what to do.

1:26:20
But she's not thinking,

Speaker 1  1:26:22
no, no, think, but she she genuinely feels in herself that she is our marketing manager. And the only reason I know that is because she sent me a couple of presentations with people's pictures and their titles on it. And her title is marketing manager. And I've gone back to her saying, please update everyone's titles to their correct titles. And she's changed it to digital digital marketing coordinator, which is what her title is. But she genuinely feels like she's, well,

Lisa Galea  1:26:54
she is maybe being a coordinator now, because she's just pushing around shit

Speaker 1  1:27:00
my butt. It's like they delegates it back to mom.

Lisa Galea  1:27:04
But that's not okay, because your mum shouldn't be designing.

1:27:07
And Mum doesn't understand, I

Lisa Galea  1:27:10
love your mum, but she shouldn't be designing. She's a carer. Yeah, she's a carer. She should be caring for people. She's not just learning. All right, let's have a think about that then, and maybe talk to your dad, because it's really it's me.

Speaker 1  1:27:27
Do you think if we get the Indian girl on, do you think we'll still be able to do the box with the addition of the Indian girl? Or are you saying, if we get the Indian girl on, we're not going to be able to have all the bots completed?

Lisa Galea  1:27:44
Well, that's what let me go through this afternoon and see what also we're not going to have every single bot we want. No but we it's like we are going to have, I think it's important we should be able to access anyone in your team can access that target information, right? Yes. So we can say, what, how do they speak? What do they need, these people? And you could put your like mine. I've got like, a brand governance one where they can put in what they're putting out in public, and it comes back and says, You've missed up. And it doesn't change it, but it marks it up, like, what they've done wrong. Okay, that seems like a core bot that I'm like, that's needed, because that will keep you all the same. Yeah, what I mean, there's this, bots, bots, bots, bots we could build. But what other bots Do you want that you also think that's important, I think for your brand governance,

Speaker 2  1:28:36
social content creator one, especially if we're going away, we want to post on socials what we're doing, where we are, sort of thing, without her having to really come up with anything really, especially

Speaker 1  1:28:51
we do international stuff, because If it takes every day or two to do anything wake up, it's like four days and it was meant to be

Lisa Galea  1:28:59
like, find that so annoying. Okay, so can you because this is what I actually thought, because I knew you girls were capable of humans. And are you okay with Adobe Express, if you had templates like that, then you had ready

1:29:15
figure it out. Yeah, yeah.

Lisa Galea  1:29:17
One, you've got a free account because your dad's account is under James that she's using, that gives you two logins, right? So two of you can be logged in at the same time, if you wanted to, which, I don't, who's paying for Canva, then she is, or you whose Canva account it is that you can get rid of that because it's the same price. It's $10 a month before Adobe Express account of your own. So that would give you another two logins if you wanted, just one that like anyone could log into. But really, the thing is, at the moment. I'm even thinking, do we need a brand governance spot when there's not anyone else making is there apart from us?

1:29:59
Yeah, we need the moment,

Lisa Galea  1:30:02
not at this point, so that's not urgent for three weeks time. No, no, if we think about it like we've already got we've got the targets there already, so we can spend time making sure that's all organized, because that does take time to do the knowledge base. So we don't really need that. What we really want is a content creator that writes based on what target you put in you're asking for. That's probably more important than checking the brand, because you'll already know it's on brand, and it will still have those target avatar community. We'll have the same like we'd be starting to build stuff out.

Speaker 1  1:30:42
Yeah. Liz, what I've tried to do because she can't make a decision on her own, so we're doing it for her. I've gone through and planned until the end of February, who we're talking to and what search to talk about for socials, yeah, and it would be really handy to be able to get her to type into the bot. I need something for builders about in house engineering to go on LinkedIn and it shoot out two suggestions and a suggested content image or something, two suggestions of script and an image. I

Lisa Galea  1:31:29
have been trying to get images out, mate and,

Speaker 4  1:31:34
oh, we haven't. We have enough images. Or it can suggest use images. Yeah, she

Lisa Galea  1:31:39
can, you know, I don't think, yeah, we want it to. We want there's a template that you then can bang your stuff in, yeah, that she doesn't actually, it's like, oh, this comes out. And we're like, okay, there's a quote template. Put that be on it. That's why I'm thinking. What you really are saying is when I'm on the road, and it's what you want to go before, just click on your phone. I want to post this right now. I want to click the photo in and I want it to already be tagged, like with stuff on the side of what I'm doing,

1:32:09
yeah, because she doesn't tag any hospitals. So

Lisa Galea  1:32:12
you want that build as much as possible, I am hoping, because Adobe actually had Adobe MAX, like last week was on the weekend, and it sounds like if we have those, because those brand libraries are already set up, see in Adobe for you. So when you would be on the road, you can go to template and all, they're already there, and that's what's so fab. It's like, I can just fix stuff up. And it's like, oh, there's a template, and everyone in the team's got it, because it's all Adobe based, and it looks like they're making friends with chat GBT. And you will be able to say, go to those libraries, and it will only take assets from those libraries, which means what we're hoping to happen will happen soon. Yeah, right now, it's not sticking only to my libraries when it's making the images, and it's very disappointing, because I was hoping like even the targets, it's like they're close enough, but the spelling's wrong, it's not okay to put out publicly. No, so that's why, I mean, occasionally ask for help, just for an idea, but I say, let's concentrate on getting the copy out for the content. I feel like content based on target audience is more important than checking for you right at this point,

Speaker 4  1:33:33
because it's like, because we've currently got, we're currently at zero, and

Lisa Galea  1:33:37
you aren't, haven't got 20 people, like, I've done that because I've got five riders, yes, and I'm nervous, right? So you haven't, you've got no content, and the only person who's going to be checking it is probably, you're in charge of marketing, aren't you?

Speaker 1  1:33:52
Well, sits with me and mom's at the moment checking content. She goes, I don't know

Lisa Galea  1:33:57
exactly, so she doesn't even know who's selling to or talking to. No, yeah, and who. What are you? What is your job title? Miss Elena.

Speaker 1  1:34:08
I am the partnerships lead. But a lot of this comes into play because I can't, we don't even have enough content or material or anything to even build a partnerships deck to go and present to potential partners. And I'm not doing that unless our website looks good. We have, like, a timeline of the business set up, and it's a it's a lot of work and effort to go and do it and get shut down and have to redo it in 12 months.

Lisa Galea  1:34:39
Yeah, they won't see you again. No, they won't give you a two door once they open it, it's like they look they're gone,

1:34:47
yeah, yeah, and you've

Lisa Galea  1:34:49
got to fight to get back. In at the

Speaker 1  1:34:51
moment, I'm just taking work off mum and dad and helping the BDMS with any work business questions that they have, and helping a little bit with upcoming events and stuff like that. So I'm pretty much, yeah, just taking

Lisa Galea  1:35:08
work off mum and dad. Is in your background marketing.

Speaker 1  1:35:12
My degree is marketing, but my background is more like relationship management, like Key Account Management, more commercials, but I understand marketing. Yeah.

Lisa Galea  1:35:27
Well, really, that's how you do relationship management. Yeah. Okay. Because you need, I mean, your mom should not be in charge of marketing.

Speaker 1  1:35:39
No, and that freaks her out. She goes, Why am I the one saying yes or no to things that go on LinkedIn? Like, she's like, I don't know.

Lisa Galea  1:35:46
No, I think that that, see, that's what I did, like for HPP, in the end, I didn't do their design. I'm basically like, I was paid like that to just, I'm having the meetings with you every month. I'm basically managing their marketing, marketing, yeah, I'm basically managing all the people, the events. What's happening the designers, we're getting quotes in bringing it then to the board and say, This is what they've done. But I'm still, because I'm talking with the board all the time. I know exactly what they need do. I'm on the board, but I'm, really, they're just paying me as an external consultant, yeah, but really, I mean, I I try not to do design as much as possible for a long time, but I still obviously have to jump in, because these guys are Wallys. But really, I'm, I'm organizing them, but I think it honestly saves you that much money from getting ripped off by tickets. Yeah, yeah, it on. I've always felt I was like, I've never felt like I've been a cost, because I'm way cheaper. Add so much value for not as like, Do you know what I mean, even if I was no but even if I was like, a full time, you pay me 85 grand a week. You're not paying my super you're not paying for my car. You're not paying any not paying anything else for me. Like 85 grand for a year is pretty cheap for me compared to what it's costing your mum and dad and super on top of that. Oh yeah. And so then, really, I'm also saving you money on printing costs, on everything that you're doing, because I can actually talk to people properly, and I know about what they're charging you. Yeah, so you end up saving shitloads of money

1:37:18
on the down lows. Well, Dad's not at home,

1:37:20
is he? Yes, but he punch here,

Speaker 1  1:37:24
I have suggested that we remove Odette and put our marketing through you and our your teams, and have it very like project based, because all this ad hoc Pig, pig is

Lisa Galea  1:37:43
it's stressful for everyone. Nothing, you're not even got good people on the job. No, nothing's

Speaker 1  1:37:51
everything's reactive, nothing's proactive, and it's very stressful. And then the outputs we're getting from Odette is a more need, and it's just, we just go around in circles,

Lisa Galea  1:38:02
yeah, because I don't even it's costing you, like, that's what I'm thinking one, I don't think you're communicating properly to a debt in terms of, you know, like, that's like there is a breakdown, obviously, in communication, but still, like the time involved is not okay, yeah, that's not okay, because that's not you should be paying 50 grants at that design level. Yeah, yeah. I'm thinking, and I know the cost of on top of of that, it's just ridiculous, having staff. They suck. Yeah, they cost too much money. I think, Okay, let me have a think about that too. Because I think, I mean, I don't I do work as a consultant, and really with amigos is what I really want. If it was long term, I'd say I'd be working at top level just to do the consulting. Be like, Okay, this is your website. Girl. I'm still managing her, but you've got someone who shows up every whatever. Do you know, I mean, but I think the website be a project that we get a quote on, and then we're like, for this project, we have this excellent girl who builds them, and this is what it's going to cost. But none of us have to stress, because I know it will be built properly, with good foundations, and then I'm just dealing with her, yes, and really, what I had with them was, like, you have a fixed price for me, but then we have, like, a I sold, like wishes. No one likes to have money spent. So what happens is, you can just ask the stuff. So you just buy 20 wishes up front, because it's like, how do you just do this when it's time? When it's tiny little things you want done, like the project, it's like, okay, we want the website, we know, and get a quote on that. But when you just want, oh, lease, I'm doing this. I'm going to a golf show. Can you grab me this shit? I don't want a quote on that. Yeah, and I can even organize my girl, whatever. And I like, okay, that's three weeks. Wishes, and then we just buy 20 wishes up front. Then when they had three wishes, I'd be like, Oh, you've only got five wishes left. When about another 20 wishes? Yeah? So if anything ad hoc does so ad hoc, we just cover by wishes, because I'm not getting quotes of her every time we want shit done, I just tell her what to do. And then we're like, oh, that was three wishes. And

1:40:08
it means that they're so quick, yeah?

Lisa Galea  1:40:11
And it's back and forth. And then the wishes, don't run out. My friend, I don't ever make them. I may say to people when they're buying them, they never run out. So basically, it's like, you've got that up your sleeve. And it's much nicer, because no one gets stung at the end with another price. Yeah, it's not like, Oh, you've got the job. And then I go, by the way, that was $15,000 and you're like, I didn't even want it. Yeah, if I know that, I would have asked, yeah, that's what happens to me. Alright? So you we really want to say, oh, that's five wishes. If I look, we didn't think that's going to be a lot, I'll say, Okay, we need to quote this. It's a website, or it's going to be needed. It's a proper project. Because even the copywriting is scaring me slightly, is because I'm doing it,

1:40:49
but I'm not a copywriter. Yeah, can we get a bot

Lisa Galea  1:40:53
to do the copyright? Oh, yeah, and it's pretty good. Yeah, it's pretty good. I think it's close enough. I think it's close enough. I'm using, I'm going the bot. I'm like, copywriters have lost their job. Basically, they are first line, they are first line attacked. But I think it would be really good, because we think long term. What I'm setting up amigos for is so that these women who I've got 100 of them in the group, right, and some of them work in medical like they're amazing women who are probably web developers. They run their own companies at home, like me, but probably not in advertising. Most of them are like copywriters or the web developers or whatever, but they I've been in this learning AI, so I really think every company needs an AI advisor. Every company needs someone who will be helping them. Like, okay, what can we do on your website? You should have a chat bot on there talking like, I'm putting away 11 like, so really, it's like, what you're designing now you're designing that because what you're designing is already abundant is useless then, because we're not even thinking about what your website should have by the end of the year as a chat bot, so we're not signature proofing the website. No, there's no like, that should be in the design now, the first thing should be like, meet our bot. We're going to help you. Yeah, and that's really what I would say. Then long term would be like, I'm happy to just be a consulting person. And then I'm thinking that we give you like an amigos, these ladies are much better at showing up than I am. They're much better at getting shit done than I am. Like, you know what? I mean? They're like, that's what they do. And I'm like, they're my teachers. I'm doing Train the Trainer with them too.

1:42:30
Yeah. So some of them, you will still

Lisa Galea  1:42:33
be our main contact. I'm your main contact, right? That's what you need, is I'm a top level person that I'm consulting to you. Then I think we work with these people that I can trust, yeah, and we work that out long term, because, like you said, right now, you ain't got nothing to do for these people, because they're not that smart? Yeah, they're not like I do. I am at the table with your mum and dad and you guys. Yes, they are not, and we really can't expect the debt to be there. No, yeah, and she's not, so we're expecting her to make strategy decisions. She's not. She's not taking responsibility for her work, but she shouldn't. She passes that on. Yeah, and that's not okay. If your mum has got annoyed with her, which is really hard to do, hard to do, I would say I've never annoyed her. I don't think maybe I have, but like, I haven't. No, I haven't because I'm useful. And like, I don't think she likes people who aren't useful. No, she doesn't, and she wants people who care. Like me. I care that if I do a shit job, I care. Yeah, I would do a good job, even if you don't pay me enough money because I give a shit. It was a good job that someone else looks it afterwards and goes, Lisa did that. Yeah. I care that my work always your name reflects, yeah, I wouldn't put my name on a like, you know, some designers like, but they only paid me a grant for that logo. I'm like, I couldn't give a shit. No one told me that. I just thought it was a shit logo. Yeah. I was like, if you're going to only quote a grand who gives a shit, still do a good job because your name is on it. Like, that's irrelevant. But I do think you're going to need more money if you want to pump this out by Friday, by three weeks. Yeah, so have a chat with your dad.

1:44:15
I don't think it's not going to be funny. No, can you let us know

Lisa Galea  1:44:19
exact prices? Yeah, well, let me look this afternoon or where we're at with the bots that we've

Speaker 4  1:44:24
got to build. Yeah, you could send out a bit of an update

Lisa Galea  1:44:28
and put down Yeah, I went through all the scope yesterday. Oh, my God, we've gone crazy with them, like, like, let's work

Speaker 2  1:44:34
out. What's the priority? What? Well, priority, I think definitely getting that front page done is a priority. Yeah.

Speaker 1  1:44:42
So I'm just nervous that all these big hoo Hahs are going to be in Hong Kong. Every single person that is going to be there is a decision. Your maker, and if they look at our website and go their shit,

1:44:53
then we've lost every opportunity ever. Yeah,

1:44:56
yeah. There's no point, even though,

Speaker 2  1:44:57
if in conference exactly total waste of like, 50

Lisa Galea  1:45:01
grand, yeah, and that's just ridiculous, yeah, alright, well, let me think I will make that your my priority. I do feel like, again, it's like, well, that's a big job as a strategy in itself, but it's not for me to do a tidy as long as you understand me to make you look good is not I don't have to. We're not worrying about you're gonna be selling, yeah, you're selling it. You're proving the point. We know that, but we do need to do a cosmetic for that front end. It's scary, yeah. And I do want you to really make sure you think of anything that you're going to send to those people that's going to touch those people in that selling process,

1:45:39
to shift them over. LSD catalog is as well

Speaker 2  1:45:43
we we've done the one we're going to give them. There's like, a little pamphlet we did for America found that one, and then we've just redesigned the CST catalog.

Speaker 1  1:45:56
Yeah, I'm just thinking it's not gonna it might cause like all the content is correct.

Lisa Galea  1:46:03
So what I want is, anything that you're going to do, why don't you make a folder up and you've got to put those spec sheets as well in as well

Speaker 4  1:46:10
as Okay, so is, what would you be able to do that?

Lisa Galea  1:46:13
Just put a folder to get I mean, you'd have to do it by today, darling. So I'm not jumping on that today. Okay, I'm not panicking about that today, but I really we need that by the end of the week, yeah? Because by the end of the week, it's like, as we get closer, it's like, if I've got time, I'll be like, do that job today. Go through that and just make sure all the fonts are right. We've gridded it up and it looks tidy. Yeah? And I did think that a lot of the stuff, when I looked at it, was missing social proof. Yes, that could be on the pages that are just there and tiny, you know, just it makes such a huge difference, that extra little nudge when they see it and they go, Oh, someone else used it. Okay, so let's have a I'll have a look at that, and I'll give you a rough rundown of what we actually have to do, but you make sure, and

1:47:02
that's it. There's so many things you could do.

Lisa Galea  1:47:08
Okay, so I'm gonna look, I'm gonna look. I think that I could almost, like, cut it down to

1:47:14
just what you needed

Lisa Galea  1:47:16
to be included, but then I wouldn't be doing any of the extra stuff which is useful for you. Yeah, okay, so that's why I was, like, what you could pay me to do this, because we are planning it. It's all there. Get a designer to do it with me managing her, you're going to get a way better output. And it's going to, I think it would take a debt a year, yeah, it would take her a year, honestly, and I don't know if that would even be good. So you would be up the 85 grand that you were going to give a design company, yeah, whereas, at least, you know, like, Wait, seriously, give me a vote right now. I'll be done in like two months. Yeah, right. So I'm not going to charge you that, but like, honestly, I'm thinking it's not going it shouldn't be anywhere near that price. Okay, good,

Speaker 1  1:48:01
okay, good, even when it helps, because we're to keep our staff numbers under 15 for this restructure. So having a

Lisa Galea  1:48:10
consultant is a lot. Honestly, I think it is. I'm doing symbolic business. I don't want any staff members, right? That's what I'm trying to work out how to build with AI, because it's every single staff member cost you two times, three times the amount in realistic costs. So that's why I like having I think I'm an entrepreneur. On is it like an in? I come in and I treat the company like it's my company. I treated HPP, I talk like it's us, me. I treat it like it's my company, and I wouldn't spend the money unless I thought it was worthwhile. I'm not. I'm treating it like it's my company. I know what it's like to run a company, so I think that that's really what you need more and it'll be way cheaper for you. Okay, I will get a roughy price on getting that done because, yeah, it's the direction. But I think like next year, we next year is really it we like you're coming into under amigos as, like, you're, we've got an AI digital advisor, but it's really marketing. I'm still your consultant. I'm, like, strategic consultant, but we need people who we can trust to be doing the jobs again, will be way cheaper than 85 grand. Like, if you had budgeted that year, you know, be like 20 grand for a website here, said even 40 grand like it's not going to be and it will be a great person who only does websites is what we need, someone who actually knows what. Yes, okay, because I can do them again, but I'm not. I'm like bodging, yeah, to make it look pretty, I can't, but they take too long. They like Lego. It, especially me. I'm trying to make it perfect everywhere. It's not good. I'm glad girls, we had this talk. I do think that you now go and look at those things. Have a chat with your dad, because it's obviously the quickest. What dates we leave the 27th Yeah, they still got 20 days. Yeah, we can get it done. But I was like, we just need I was like, I would spend that extra money to get it done. Because I was like, otherwise, it'll just be waiting forever, and I don't even know if that person is going to be able to do this. Yeah. So that's why today. I was like, Okay, well, let's have a lineup, but I'll get a rough idea, so I can give you a okay, this is how much extra money it's going to be, but let's also

Speaker 6  1:50:32
see what we're going to get as deliverables. Yeah, I was gonna

Lisa Galea  1:50:36
say, she's told me it's an Elementor. Normally, I would actually log in before I commit to that. But if it's in an Elementor, I should be fine to do that up, Right?

Speaker 6  1:50:46
I'll speak to you soon, My friends, 
